District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.04

Choice of law.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the law of the issuing state governs:

(1)

The nature, extent, amount, and duration of current payments under a registered support order;

(2)

The computation and payment of arrearages and accrual of interest on the arrearages under the support order; and

(3)

The existence and satisfaction of other obligations under the support order.

(b)

In a proceeding for arrears under a registered support order, the statute of limitation of the District or of the issuing state, whichever is longer, applies.

(c)

A responding tribunal of the District shall apply the procedures and remedies of the District to enforce current support and collect arrears and interest due on a support order of another state registered in the District.

(d)

After a tribunal of the District or another state determines which is the controlling order and issues an order consolidating arrears, if any, a tribunal of the District shall prospectively apply the law of the state issuing the controlling order, including its law on interest on arrears, on current and future support, and on consolidated arrears.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 604, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(4), 53 DCR 3634

Section References

This section is referenced in § 46-306.07.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-346.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 604 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).